Nebraska, session 109, LB572.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB572 LB572
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1028.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1028.01 (1) For each school fiscal year, a school district may
exceed its budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures
as calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school fiscal year by
a specific dollar amount for the following exclusions:
(a) Expenditures for repairs to infrastructure damaged by a natural
disaster which is declared a disaster emergency pursuant to the Emergency
Management Act;
(b) Expenditures for judgments, except judgments or orders from the
Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a school district
which require or obligate a school district to pay such judgment, to the
extent such judgment is not paid by liability insurance coverage of a
school district;
(c) Expenditures pursuant to the Retirement Incentive Plan
authorized in section 79-855 or the Staff Development Assistance
authorized in section 79-856;
(d) Expenditures of amounts received from educational entities as
defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing distance education courses
through the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council to such
educational entities;
(e) Expenditures to pay for employer contributions pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 79-958 to the School Employees Retirement
System of the State of Nebraska to the extent that such expenditures
exceed the employer contributions under such subsection that would have
been made at a contribution rate of seven and thirty-five hundredths
percent;
(f) Expenditures to pay for school district contributions pursuant
to subdivision (1)(c)(i) or (1)(d)(i) of section 79-9,113 to the
retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act to the extent that such expenditures exceed the school
-2-

LB572 LB572
2025 2025
district contributions under such subdivision that would have been made
at a contribution rate of seven and thirty-seven hundredths percent;
(g) Expenditures for incentives agreed to be paid by a school
district to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary
termination of employment occurring prior to July 1, 2009, occurring on
or after the last day of the 2010-11 school year and prior to the first
day of the 2013-14 school year, or, to the extent that a district
demonstrates to the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section that the agreement will result in a net savings in salary
and benefit costs to the school district over a five-year period,
occurring on or after the first day of the 2013-14 school year and prior
to September 1, 2017;
(h) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures
otherwise equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for such school district as calculated pursuant to section
79-1023 for such school fiscal year for current and future qualified
voluntary termination incentives for certificated teachers pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that are not otherwise included in an
exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(i) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures
otherwise equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for such school district as calculated pursuant to section
79-1023 for such school fiscal year for seventy-five percent of
incentives agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2017,
and August 31, 2018, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in
force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in
an exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(j) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures
otherwise equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for such school district as calculated pursuant to section
-3-

LB572 LB572
2025 2025
79-1023 for such school fiscal year for fifty percent of incentives
agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary
termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2018, and August
31, 2019, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and
effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an
exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(k) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures
otherwise equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for such school district as calculated pursuant to section
79-1023 for such school fiscal year for twenty-five percent of incentives
agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary
termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2019, and August
31, 2020, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and
effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an
exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(l) The special education budget of expenditures;
(m) Expenditures of special grant funds; and
(n) Expenditures of funds received as federal impact aid pursuant to
20 U.S.C. 7701 to 7714, as such sections existed on January 1, 2016, due
to a district having land within its boundaries that is federal property
classified as Indian lands under 20 U.S.C. 7713(7), as such section
existed on January 1, 2016, and funds received as impact aid due to
children in attendance who resided on Indian lands in accordance with 20
U.S.C. 7703(a)(1)(C), as such section existed on January 1, 2016; and .
(o) Expenditures for stipends paid to any student teacher or intern
as defined in section 79-875 who is completing a supervised teaching
practicum in a Nebraska public or private school as part of the
requirements for teacher certification.
(2) For each school fiscal year, a school district may exceed its
budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures as
calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school fiscal year by a
-4-

LB572 LB572
2025 2025
specific dollar amount and include such dollar amount in the budget of
expenditures used to calculate budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures pursuant to section 79-1023 for future years for
the following exclusions:
(a) The first school fiscal year the district will be participating
in Network Nebraska for the full school fiscal year, for the difference
of the estimated expenditures for such school fiscal year for
telecommunications services, access to data transmission networks that
transmit data to and from the school district, and the transmission of
data on such networks as such expenditures are defined by the department
for purposes of the distance education and telecommunications allowance
minus the dollar amount of such expenditures for the second school fiscal
year preceding the first full school fiscal year the district
participates in Network Nebraska;
(b) Expenditures for new elementary attendance sites in the first
year of operation or the first year of operation after being closed for
at least one school year if such elementary attendance site will most
likely qualify for the elementary site allowance in the immediately
following school fiscal year as determined by the state board;
(c) For the first school fiscal year for which early childhood
education membership is included in formula students for the calculation
of state aid, expenditures for early childhood education equal to the
amount the school district received in early childhood education grants
pursuant to section 79-1103 for the prior school fiscal year, increased
by the basic allowable growth rate; and
(d) For school fiscal year 2013-14, an amount not to exceed two
percent over the previous school year if such increase is approved by a
seventy-five percent majority vote of the school board of such district.
(3) The state board shall approve, deny, or modify the amount
allowed for any exclusions to the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures pursuant to this section.
-5-

LB572 LB572
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Section 79-3404, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3404 The School District Property Tax Limitation Act shall not
apply to that portion of a school district's property tax request that is
needed (a) to pay the principal and interest on approved bonds or (b) to
pay for stipends to student teachers or interns as described in
subdivision (1)(o) of section 79-1028.01.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-1028.01 and 79-3404, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-